Massachusetts, session 194th, H812.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 55 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of “Electioneering communication” and inserting in place thereof the following:-
''Electioneering communication'', any broadcast, cable, mail, satellite, print, SMS text
message, MMS text message or other text message communication that: (1) refers to a clearly
identified candidate; and (2) is publicly distributed within 90 days before an election in which
the candidate is seeking election or reelection; provided, however, that ''electioneering
communication'' shall not include the following communications: (1) a communication that is
disseminated through a means other than a broadcast station, radio station, cable television
system or satellite system, newspaper, magazine, periodical, billboard advertisement, SMS text
message, MMS text message, other text message or mail; (2) a communication to less than 100
of 3

recipients; (3) a news story, commentary, letter to the editor, news release, column, op-ed or
editorial broadcast by a television station, radio station, cable television system or satellite
system, or printed in a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical in general circulation; (4)
expenditures or independent expenditures or contributions that must otherwise be reported under
this chapter; (5) a communication from a membership organization exclusively to its members
and their families, otherwise known as a membership communication; (6) bonafide candidate
debates or forums and advertising or promotion of the same; (7) email communications; and (8)
internet communications which are not paid advertisements.
SECTION 2. Section 18G of chapter 55 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting a new paragraph after the second paragraph that states the following:
An independent expenditure or electioneering communication made by an individual,
corporation, group, association, labor union or other entity which is transmitted through SMS
text message, MMS text message or other text message shall include within the message a
written statement disclosing the identity of the individual, corporation, group, association, labor
union or other entity paying for the communication and the words ''Top Contributors'' and a
written statement that lists the 5 persons or entities or if fewer than 5 persons or entities, all
persons or entities that made the largest contributions to that entity, regardless of the purpose for
which the funds were given; provided, however, that only contributions in excess of $1,000
reportable pursuant to this chapter during the 12–month period before the date of the
advertisement or communication shall be listed. If no such contribution is received by the entity
making an independent expenditure or electioneering communication, the advertisement or
communication may exclude the statement. The communication shall also include a written
statement, as specified by the director, at the bottom of the communication that directs viewers to
of 3

the official web address of the office of campaign and political finance. This paragraph shall also
apply to communications purchased to influence or affect the vote on a question submitted to the
voters.
of 3